Vermont, session 2025-2026, S328.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Common Interest Community Resources * * *
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 119 is added to read:
§ 119. COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY RESOURCES
The Secretary of State shall provide on its website or otherwise distribute to
the public information about Vermont’s common interest communities. This
information shall include the governing statutes.
* * * Service-Supported Housing * * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 3098 is added to read:
§ 3098. SERVICE-SUPPORTED HOUSING ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) The Service-Supported Housing Advisory Council is created for the
purpose of identifying opportunities for increased alignment between human
services programs and policies serving individuals who receive Medicaid-
funded Developmental Disability Services and housing capital and support
services programs.
(b) The Advisory Council shall be overseen by the Department of
Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living and shall be composed of the
following individuals:
(1) one member, appointed by the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Board;
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 2 of 26
2026
(2) the Secretary of Human Services or designee;
(3) the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living or
designee;
(4) the State Treasurer or designee;
(5) the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development or
designee;
(6) two members, appointed by the Developmental Disabilities Housing
Initiative;
(7) the Executive Director of the Vermont Developmental Disabilities
Council or designee;
(8) two members, appointed by Green Mountain Self-Advocates; and
(9) one member, appointed by Vermont Care Partners.
(c)(1) The Advisory Council shall meet at least monthly.
(2) The Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living
shall convene the first meeting of the Advisory Council, during which the
Advisory Council shall elect a chair from among its members.
(d) The Advisory Council shall have the administrative, technical, and legal
assistance of the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living.
(e) When requested by the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board, the
Advisory Council shall provide advice to the Board regarding the expenditure
of funds for the production of permanently affordable housing for individuals
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 3 of 26
2026
who are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded Developmental Disability
Services.
(f)(1) The Advisory Council shall report annually on or before November
15 to the House Committees on General and Housing and on Human Services
and the Senate Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General
Affairs and on Health and Welfare regarding:
(A) administrative and programmatic reforms carried out to better
align support-services and housing development programs and policies,
including examples of projects or progress enabled by those changes;
(B) a housing needs assessment for individuals served by the
Developmental Disabilities Services System of Care, including a summary of
the number of units and an overview of the types of housing needed to support
this population;
(C) activities undertaken pursuant to this section; and
(D) recommendations for future legislative action and funding
sources, including actionable recommendations for changes in State laws or
policies that are obstacles to the creation of housing needed by individuals who
are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded Developmental Disability Services.
(2) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the annual report to be made under this subsection.
(g) Members of the Advisory Council who are not otherwise compensated
for their time shall be entitled to per diem compensation as permitted under
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 4 of 26
2026
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for meetings of the Advisory Council. Payments to
members of the Advisory Council authorized under this subsection shall be
made from monies appropriated to the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living’s base budget.
* * * Vermont State Treasurer Credit Facility * * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 10 is amended to read:
§ 10. VERMONT STATE TREASURER; CREDIT FACILITY FOR LOCAL
INVESTMENTS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. § 433(a) to the contrary,
the Vermont State Treasurer shall have the authority to establish a credit
facility of up to 10 12.5 percent of the State’s average cash balance on terms
acceptable to the Treasurer and consistent with prudent investment principles
and guidelines pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 433(b)–(c)(b) and (c) and the Uniform
Prudent Investor Act, 14A V.S.A. chapter 9.
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. § 433(a) to the contrary,
and in addition to the provisions of subsection (a) on of this section, the
Vermont State Treasurer shall have the authority to establish a credit facility of
up to two and one-half percent of the State’s average cash balance on terms
acceptable to the Treasurer and consistent with prudent investment principles
and guidelines pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 433(b)–(c) 433(b) and (c) and the
Uniform Prudent Investor Act, 14A V.S.A. chapter 9. The Treasurer may use
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 5 of 26
2026
amounts available under this subsection only to provide financing for climate
infrastructure and resilience projects and may modify the terms of such
financing in the Treasurer’s discretion as is necessary to protect the interest
interests of the State.
(d)(1) Annually, on or before November 15, the Treasurer shall submit a
report detailing the activities, financing, and accounting of any credit facilities
created pursuant to subsection (c) of this section during the preceding calendar
year to the Governor; the House Committees on Appropriations, on Commerce
and Economic Development, and on Ways and Means; and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations, on Economic Development, Housing and
General Affairs, and on Finance.
(2) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the annual report to be made under this subsection.
* * * Off-Site Construction Accelerator Pilot * * *
Sec. 4. OFF-SITE CONSTRUCTION ACCELERATOR PILOT
(a)(1) The Office of the State Treasurer may develop and administer a pilot
demonstration project that explores the possibility of reducing housing
development costs through modular construction.
(2) The Treasurer may utilize requests for information or requests for
proposal to identify participating modular construction manufacturers and
developers and to determine manufacturer and developer needs and priorities.
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 6 of 26
2026
(3) In contracting with a manufacturer or developer under this pilot
program, the State Treasurer shall be exempt from the requirements of 3
V.S.A. chapter 14.
(4) In order to fund off-site constructed housing under the pilot program
authorized by this section, the Treasurer may utilize funds authorized under 10
V.S.A. § 10 subject to the requirements of that section.
(b) The pilot may consider the following elements:
(1) bulk purchasing for a single development or aggregation of multiple
developments;
(2) creating a loan loss reserve for construction loans;
(3) utilization of off-site construction, including panelized or volumetric
modular construction; and
(4) establishing a statewide procurement consortium for bulk orders of
modular units and materials.
(c)(1) As part of the pilot, the Office of the State Treasurer may identify the
feasibility of the State providing a guarantee or other device to facilitate bulk
purchasing of the off-site construction of homes.
(2) Prior to distributing any funds under this section, the Treasurer shall
consult with the Department of Housing and Community Development, the
Vermont Economic Progress Council, the Vermont State Housing Authority,
the Vermont Housing Finance Agency, and the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board.
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 7 of 26
2026
(d) On or before January 15, 2027, the Treasurer shall submit a written
report to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
* * * Vermont Economic Development Authority * * *
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 212 is amended to read:
§ 212. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(6) “Eligible facility” or “eligible project” means any industrial,
commercial, or agricultural enterprise or endeavor approved by the Authority
used in a trade or business whether or not such business is operated for profit,
including land and rights in land, air, or water; buildings; structures;
machinery; and equipment of such eligible facilities or eligible projects, except
that an eligible facility or project shall not include the portion of an enterprise
or endeavor relating to the sale of goods at retail where such goods are
manufactured primarily out of State, and except further that an eligible facility
or project shall not include the portion of an enterprise or endeavor relating to
housing unless otherwise authorized in this chapter. Such enterprises or
endeavors may include:
* * *
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 8 of 26
2026
(U) After consultation with, and with deference to, the Vermont
Housing Finance Agency on applications that are eligible for financing from
both the Authority and the Agency, multiunit housing developments of five or
more units when requested by, and jointly financed with, a financing lender,
except that the Authority shall not finance portions or phases of a multiunit
housing development that:
(i) the Agency determines is being primarily developed for
occupancy by persons and families of low and moderate income as defined in
subdivision 601(11) of this title; or
(ii) utilizes funding issued by the Agency, whether in the form of
debt or tax credits.
* * *
* * * Vermont Housing Finance Agency * * *
Sec. 5a. INTENT TO CODIFY RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING LOAN
PROGRAM
The intent and purpose of Sec. 5b of this act is to codify in statute the
Rental Housing Revolving Loan Program originally enacted in 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. 47, as amended by 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 69. The
Program designed and implemented by the Vermont Housing Finance Agency
shall remain in effect under 10 V.S.A. § 629. Loans issued through the
Program prior to July 1, 2026, shall remain in effect in accordance with the
executed terms and conditions.
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 9 of 26
2026
Sec. 5b. 10 V.S.A. chapter 25 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 25. VERMONT HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY
* * *
Subchapter 3. Powers and Duties
* * *
§ 629. RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM
(a) Creation; administration. The Vermont Housing Finance Agency shall
design and implement a Rental Housing Revolving Loan Program and shall
create and administer a revolving loan fund to provide subsidized loans for
rental housing developments that serve middle-income households.
(b) Loans; eligibility; criteria.
(1) The Agency shall adopt processes, procedures, and guidelines to
implement the Program consistent with this section, including a simple
application process that is accessible to small developers, builders, and
contractors.
(2)(A) To be eligible for a subsidized loan through the Program, a
project shall create two or more new rental housing units, which may include
market rate and affordable units, provided that at least 25 percent of the units
in the project are affordable to a household earning up to 150 percent of the
applicable area median income.
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 10 of 26
2026
(B) Projects may include new construction, acquisition with
substantial rehabilitation, and preservation of naturally occurring affordable
housing.
(3) A loan is available only for the costs of the project allocable to the
affordable units.
(4)(A) The Agency shall calculate the maximum amount of a loan,
which shall not exceed the lesser of:
(i) 35 percent of the costs of the project allocable to the affordable
units; or
(ii) the following amounts based on area median income bands:
(I) $150,000.00 per unit for each unit that is affordable to a
household earning up to 80 percent of area median income; and
(II) $100,000.00 per unit for each unit that is affordable to a
household earning from 81 to 150 percent of area median income.
(B) The Agency shall adopt and implement a method to adjust the
values specified in subdivision (A)(ii) of this subdivision (4) at least annually
for inflation and may adopt a smoothing mechanism to adjust the maximum
loan values within each band based on levels of affordability.
(5) The Agency shall determine the term and interest rate of a loan. The
Agency may adopt one or more mechanisms to provide an enhanced subsidy to
incentivize projects, including:
(A) a lower interest rate;
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 11 of 26
2026
(B) an interest-only option with deferred principal repayment; and
(C) partial loan forgiveness.
(6) The Agency shall adopt a Program plan that allows for an enhanced
subsidy for a project that meets one or more of the following criteria:
(A) The project receives five percent or more of the total funding
from an employer or employer-capitalized loan or grant.
(B) The project receives five percent or more of the total funding
from a municipal or regional housing fund, local fiscal recovery fund, or other
form of community investment.
(C) The project utilizes tax-exempt bond funding or federal low-
income housing tax credits for at least 20 percent of the project’s total units.
(D) The project is small in scale and provides infill development
within a historic settlement pattern.
(7) The Agency shall use one or more legal mechanisms to ensure that:
(A) a subsidized unit remains affordable to a household earning the
applicable percent of area median income for the longer of:
(i) seven years; or
(ii) full repayment of the loan plus three years; and
(B) during the affordability period determined pursuant to
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7), the annual increase in rent for a
subsidized unit does not exceed three percent or an amount otherwise
authorized by the Agency.
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 12 of 26
2026
(c) Program design.
(1) When designing and implementing the Program, the Agency shall
consult stakeholders and experts in the field.
(2) The Program shall include:
(A) a streamlined and appropriately scaled application process;
(B) an outreach and education plan, including specific tactics to reach
and support eligible applicants, especially those from underserved regions or
sectors; and
(C) an equitable system for distributing investment statewide on the
basis of need according to a system of priorities that includes consideration of:
(i) geographic distribution;
(ii) community size;
(iii) community economic need; and
(iv) whether an application has already received an investment or
is from an applicant in a community that has already received Program
funding.
(3) The Agency shall use its best efforts to ensure that:
(A) investments are targeted to the geographic communities or
regions with the most pressing economic and employment needs; and
(B) the allocation of investments provides equitable access to the
benefits to all eligible geographical areas.
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 13 of 26
2026
(d) Revolving funds. The Agency shall retain payments of principal,
interest, and any fees in a revolving loan fund, the amounts of which it shall
use to issue future loans through the Program.
(e) Annual report. The Agency shall include information on the status of
the Program as part of the annual report required by section 639 of this title.
* * *
* * * VHIP * * *
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 699 is amended to read:
§ 699. VERMONT RENTAL HOUSING IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM
* * *
(j) Annual report. Annually, on or before November 15, the Department
shall submit a report to the House Committees on Human Services and on
General and Housing and the Senate Committee on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs regarding the following:
(1) separately, the number of units funded and the number of units
rehabilitated through grants, through a five-year forgivable loan, and through a
10-year forgivable loan;
(2) for grants and five-year forgivable loans, for the first year after the
expiration of the lease requirements outlined in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section, whether the unit is still occupied by a tenant who meets the
qualifications of that subdivision;
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 14 of 26
2026
(3) for each program, for the first year after the expiration of the
applicable lease requirements outlined in this section, the amount of rent
charged by the landlord and how that rent compares to fair market rent
established by the Department of Housing and Urban Development; and
(4) the rate of turnover for tenants housed utilizing grants or five-year
forgivable loans and 10-year forgivable loans separately.
* * * Special Assessment Bonds * * *
Sec. 7. 24 V.S.A. § 3257 is added to read:
§ 3257. SPECIAL ASSESSMENT BONDS
(a) Upon approval of the legislative body of the municipality and subject to
subsection (c) of this section, a municipality may issue revenue bonds for the
purpose of financing a public improvement for the benefit of the limited area
of the municipality to be served by the improvement. A revenue bond issued
under this section is issued for an essential and governmental purpose.
(b) A revenue bond issued pursuant to this section shall be payable solely
and exclusively from the special assessments levied on the properties to be
served by the improvement and shall not constitute general indebtedness of the
municipality. No holder of a bond issued under this section shall have the right
to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the municipality to pay on the
bond.
(c) The municipality may issue a revenue bond pursuant to this section only
if one or more of the following conditions are met:
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 15 of 26
2026
(1) one of the following entities provides a commitment letter for the
issuance:
(A) the Vermont Bond Bank;
(B) a bank regulated by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation,
the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, or the Federal Reserve Board;
or
(C) a credit union regulated by the National Credit Union
Administration; or
(2) a nationally recognized statistical rating organization that has an
active U.S. public finance practice rates the issuance at a minimum credit
rating of BBB or equivalent.
Sec. 7a. 24 V.S.A. § 1896(c) is amended to read:
(c) Notwithstanding any charter provision or other provision, all property
taxes assessed within a district shall be subject to the provision of subsection
(a) of this section. Special assessments levied under chapters 76A or 87 of this
title or under a municipal charter shall not be considered property taxes for the
purpose of this section if the proceeds are used exclusively for operating
expenses related to properties within the district, and not for improvements
within the district, as defined in subdivision 1891(4) of this title, or if the
special assessments secure a special assessment bond issued pursuant to
section 3257 of this title.
Sec. 7b. 24 V.S.A. § 1910b(f) is amended to read:
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 16 of 26
2026
(f) Notwithstanding any charter provision or other provision, all
property taxes assessed within a housing development site shall be subject to
the provisions of this section. Special assessments levied under chapter 76A or
87 of this title or under a municipal charter shall not be considered property
taxes for the purpose of this section if the proceeds are used exclusively for
operating expenses related to properties within the housing development site
and not for improvements within the housing development site or if the special
assessments secure a special assessment bond issued pursuant to section 3257
of this title.
* * * Municipal Plans * * *
Sec. 8. 24 V.S.A. § 4382 is amended to read:
§ 4382. THE PLAN FOR A MUNICIPALITY
(a) A plan for a municipality shall be consistent with the goals established
in section 4302 of this title and compatible with approved plans of other
municipalities in the region and with the regional plan and shall include the
following:
* * *
(10) A housing element that shall include a recommended program for
public and private actions to address housing needs and targets as identified by
the regional planning commission pursuant to subdivision 4348a(a)(9) of this
title. The housing element shall also include an analysis of any
regulatory, labor, and physical constraints preventing the development,
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 17 of 26
2026
redevelopment, or rehabilitation of sufficient housing to meet the housing
needs and targets, and a description of what actions the municipality may take
to accommodate the projected housing needs. The program shall use data on
year-round and seasonal dwellings and include specific actions to address the
housing needs of persons with low income and persons with moderate income
and account for permitted residential development as described in section 4412
of this title. Progress toward the construction of the housing units identified as
needed to meet projected housing targets shall be documented within the
housing element and updated as appropriate when the plan is amended or
readopted according to section 4385 or 4387 of this title, as the case may be.
* * *
* * * Municipal Zoning * * *
Sec. 9. 24 V.S.A. § 4412 is amended to read:
§ 4412. REQUIRED PROVISIONS AND PROHIBITED EFFECTS
Notwithstanding any existing bylaw, the following land development
provisions shall apply in every municipality:
(1) Equal treatment of housing and required provisions for affordable
housing.
* * *
(B) Except as provided in subdivisions 4414(1)(E) and (F) of this
title, no bylaw shall have the effect of excluding mobile homes, modular
housing, manufactured housing, or prefabricated housing from any district that
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 18 of 26
2026
allows year-round residential development in the municipality, except upon the
same terms and conditions as conventional housing is excluded. A
municipality may establish specific site standards in the bylaws to regulate
individual sites within preexisting mobile home parks with regard to distances
between structures and other standards as necessary to ensure public health,
safety, and welfare, provided the standards do not have the effect of
prohibiting the replacement of mobile homes on existing lots.
* * *
(D) Bylaws shall designate appropriate districts and reasonable
regulations for multiunit or multifamily dwellings. No bylaw shall have the
effect of excluding these multiunit or multifamily dwellings from the
municipality. In any district that allows year-round residential development,
duplexes shall be an allowed a permitted use with dimensional standards that
are not more restrictive than is required for a single-unit dwelling, including no
additional land or lot area than would be required for a single-unit dwelling. In
any district that is served by municipal sewer and water infrastructure that
allows residential development, multiunit dwellings with four or fewer units
shall be a permitted use on the same size lot as a single-unit dwelling, unless
that district specifically requires multiunit structures to have more than four
dwelling units.
(E) Except for flood hazard and fluvial erosion area bylaws adopted
pursuant to section 4424 of this title, no bylaw shall have the effect of
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 19 of 26
2026
excluding as a permitted use one accessory dwelling unit that is located within
or appurtenant to a single-family dwelling on an owner-occupied lot. A bylaw
shall require a single-family dwelling with an accessory dwelling unit to be
subject to the same review, dimensional, or other controls as required for a
single-family dwelling without an accessory dwelling unit. The criteria for
conversion of an existing detached nonresidential building to habitable space
for an accessory dwelling unit shall not be more restrictive than the criteria
used for a single-family dwelling without an accessory dwelling unit.
* * *
(15) No bylaw shall require a duplex to be constructed on an owner-
occupied lot.
Sec. 9a. 24 V.S.A. § 4412 is amended to read:
§ 4412. REQUIRED PROVISIONS AND PROHIBITED EFFECTS
Notwithstanding any existing bylaw, the following land development
provisions shall apply in every municipality:
(1) Equal treatment of housing and required provisions for affordable
housing.
* * *
(D) Bylaws shall designate appropriate districts and reasonable
regulations for multiunit or multifamily dwellings. No bylaw shall have the
effect of excluding these multiunit or multifamily dwellings from the
municipality. In any district that allows year-round residential development,
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 20 of 26
2026
duplexes shall be a permitted use with dimensional standards that are not more
restrictive than is required for a single-unit dwelling, including no additional
land or lot area than would be required for a single-unit dwelling. In any
district that is served by municipal sewer and water infrastructure that allows
residential development, multiunit dwellings with four or fewer units shall be a
permitted use on the same size lot as a single-unit dwelling, unless that district
specifically requires multiunit structures to have more than four dwelling units.
* * *
(15) No bylaw shall require a duplex to be constructed on an owner-
occupied lot. [Repealed.]
* * * State Community Investment Program * * *
Sec. 9b. 24 V.S.A. § 5803 is amended to read:
§ 5803. DESIGNATION OF DOWNTOWN AND VILLAGE CENTERS
* * *
(f) Benefits Steps. A center may receive the benefits associated with the
steps in this section by meeting the established requirements. The Department
shall review applications from municipalities to advance from Step One to
Two and from Step Two to Three and issue written decisions. The Department
shall issue a written administrative decision within 30 days following an
application. If a municipal application is rejected by the Department, the
municipality may appeal the administrative decision to the State Board. To
maintain a downtown approved under chapter 76A after December 31, 2026,
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 21 of 26
2026
the municipality shall apply for renewal following a regional planning
approval by the LURB and meet the program requirements. Step Three
designations that are not approved for renewal revert to Step Two. The
municipality may appeal the administrative decision of the Department to the
State Board. Appeals of administrative decisions shall be heard by the State
Board at the next meeting following a timely filing stating the reasons for the
appeal. The State Board’s decision is final. The Department shall issue
guidance to administer these steps.
* * *
(2) Step Two.
(A) Requirements. Step Two is established to create a mid-level
designation for villages throughout the State to increase planning and
implementation capacity for community-scale projects. A center reaches Step
Two if it:
* * *
(iv) a portion of the center is listed or eligible for listing in the
National Register of Historic Places, unless recognized by the program as a
preexisting designated new town center.
* * *
(3) Step Three.
(A) Requirements. Step Three is established to create an advanced
designation for downtowns throughout the State to create mixed-use centers
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 22 of 26
2026
and join the Vermont Downtown Program. A center reaches Step Three if the
Department finds that it meets the following requirements:
* * *
(ii) Is A portion of the center is listed or eligible for listing in the
National Register of Historic Places, unless recognized by the program as a
preexisting designated new town center.
* * *
* * * Reports * * *
Sec. 10. OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE COUNSEL; COMMON INTEREST
COMMUNITY REPORT
(a) On or before November 15, 2026, the Office of Legislative Counsel
shall provide a written report to the House Committee on General and Housing
and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General
Affairs outlining any legal, conventional financing, and funding compliance
issues related to requiring common interest communities to:
(1) authorize leasing of residential units;
(2) authorize commercial purposes within a dwelling unit;
(3) permit the construction of accessory dwelling units on land reserved
for the exclusive use of a unit owner; and
(4) permit the installation and use of vegetable gardens within a unit
owner’s designated exclusive use space.
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 23 of 26
2026
(b) In developing the report, the Office shall work with and identify
external partners with knowledge and expertise in common interest
communities across the State.
Sec. 11. VERMONT HOUSING AND CONSERVATION BOARD;
FARMWORKER HOUSING REPORT
On or before January 15, 2027, the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Board shall submit a written report to the General Assembly with information
on the progress made towards meeting the goals identified in the Farmworker
Housing Needs Assessment of 2021. The report shall describe the farmworker
housing program established by the Board following the initial report, evaluate
the program’s impact on farmworker housing in Vermont, and identify barriers
to improving and expanding farmworker housing.
Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT; CORPORATE PURCHASE OF HOMES
REPORT
(a)(1) On or before November 15, 2026, the Department of Housing and
Community Development shall submit a report to the House Committee on
General and Housing and the Senate Committee on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs with information on the purchase in Vermont of
single- and two-family residences by institutional real estate investors. As part
of the report, the Department shall provide the following information:
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 24 of 26
2026
(A) bills introduced in other states implementing restrictions or
limitations on the corporate purchase of single- or two-family residences;
(B) the number of covered entities operating in Vermont;
(C) the number of single- and two-family residences owned by
covered entities in Vermont;
(D) the number of single- and two-family residences purchased by a
covered entity in Vermont between 2020 and 2026; and
(E) proposed methods of enforcement to ensure effective
implementation of any statutory restriction on the corporate purchase of single-
or two-family residences.
(2) In the event the Department cannot provide the information required
by subdivisions (1)(B)–(D) of this subsection, the Department shall identify
methods of gathering the information for future use.
(b) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Covered entity” means an institutional real estate investor or an
entity that receives funding from an institutional real estate investor for the
purchase of a single-family residence or two-family residence. A loan
provided in exchange for a mortgage of the residence that is being purchased
shall not be considered funding for the purposes of this subdivision (1),
provided that such mortgage shall be of a type for which members of the
general public can apply.
(B) “Covered entity” does not include:
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 25 of 26
2026
(i) an organization that is described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code and exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(ii) a land bank;
(iii) a community land trust; or
(iv) a creditor or its loan servicer acquiring ownership of real
property in full or partial satisfaction of a secured debt.
(2)(A) “Institutional real estate investor” means an entity or combined
group that, directly or indirectly:
(i) owns 10 or more single-family residences or two-family
residences, or both;
(ii) manages or receives funds pooled from investors and acts as a
fiduciary with respect to one or more investors; and
(iii) has $30,000,000.00 or more in net value or assets under
management on any day during the taxable year.
(B) An entity is considered owning a single-family residence or two-
family residence if it directly owns the single-family residence or two-family
residence or indirectly owns 10 percent or more of the single-family residence
or two-family residence.
(3) “Single-family residence” means a residential property consisting of
one dwelling unit, provided that the term does not include:
VT LEG #390272 v.1

No. 179 Page 26 of 26
2026
(A) any single-family residence that is to be used as the principal
residence of any person who has an ownership interest in the covered entity
that seeks to purchase the single-family residence; or
(B) any single-family residence constructed, acquired, or operated
with federal, state, or local appropriated funding sources.
(4) “Two-family residence” means a residential property consisting of
two dwelling units, provided that the term does not include:
(A) any two-family residence in which one of the dwelling units is to
be used as the principal residence of any person who has an ownership interest
in the covered entity that seeks to purchase the two-family residence; or
(B) any two-family residence constructed, acquired, or operated with
federal, State, or local appropriated funding sources.
* * * Fiscal Year 2024 Appropriation to VHCB * * *
Sec. 13. [Deleted.]
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, except that Sec. 9a shall take
effect on January 1, 2028.
Date Governor signed bill: June 18, 2026
VT LEG #390272 v.1